Utah statutes.
59-26-106.   Records.
(1)  A multi-channel video or audio service provider shall maintain records,
statements, books, or accounts necessary to determine the amount of tax that
the multi-channel video or audio service provider is required to remit to the
commission under this chapter.
(2)  The commission may require a multi-channel video or audio service
provider to make or keep the records, statements, books, or accounts the
commission considers sufficient to show the amount of tax for which the multi-
channel video or audio service provider is required to remit to the commission
under this chapter:
(a)  by notice served upon that multi-channel video or audio service provider;
or
(b)  by administrative rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(3)  After notice by the commission, a multi-channel video or audio service
provider shall open the records, statements, books, or accounts specified in
Subsection (2) for examination by the commission or a duly authorized agent of
the commission.
